Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.190

Complaint of violation—Request for inspection—Notice—Confidentiality.

Any person may request an inspection of any nursing home subject to licensing under this chapter in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by giving notice to the department of an alleged violation of applicable requirements of state law. The complainant shall be encouraged to submit a written, signed complaint following a verbal report. The substance of the complaint shall be provided to the licensee no earlier than at the commencement of the inspection. Neither the substance of the complaint provided the licensee nor any copy of the complaint or record published, released, or otherwise made available to the licensee shall disclose the name of any individual complainant or other person mentioned in the complaint, except the name or names of any duly authorized officer, employee, or agent of the department conducting the investigation or inspection pursuant to this chapter, unless such complainant specifically requests the release of such name or names.

[ 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 20; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.